Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Interim and Supplemental Financing

154.20-520.
Trust funds — Payments.

There are hereby established in the Treasury of the Commonwealth trust funds for each area of responsibility for which it was established, and to which shall be credited all funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the authority for the purposes of this chapter, together with interest earned by these funds and all funds obtained by the authority from other sources which, by contract or otherwise, are payable into such funds. The authority may request, and such request shall be honored, that the trust funds be invested and reinvested for the benefit of the authority until such time as the funds are needed to satisfy loan commitments. Income from the investments shall be credited to the authority’s funds. If at any time the authority shall determine the moneys in any fund exceed the amount needed by the authority to carry out the purposes of this chapter as it relates to a particular area of responsibility, the authority shall take such action as shall be required to transfer the excess amounts from the fund for one (1) area of responsibility to the fund for another area of responsibility as economic development needs dictate and are determined by the authority or shall release such excess funds and transfer such excess funds to the general fund of the State Treasury.

The mortgage insurance fund shall be used solely and only as reserve for insurance commitments and to pay the costs of procuring insurance of private or governmental loans to accomplish the purposes of the authority as stated in KRS 154.20-030. Such costs shall be paid from said fund upon approval by the authority solely under terms of its contract with the insurance corporation, and may include the costs of obtaining interim and permanent guarantees which are authorized by this chapter, whether or not the loan application finally results in a loan or guarantee by the government.

All loans and all costs of administration of this chapter shall be paid out of the authority’s funds. Payments shall be made in the same manner as other state expenditures, except that they shall be subject to the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet only as to availability of funds.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 14, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 16, effective July 15, 1980.

154.20-530.
Mortgage insurance corporation — Trust account.

The authority may cause to be established, by any number of natural persons not in excess of fifteen (15), a Kentucky nonprofit corporation which shall have as its purpose the insurance of mortgage loans entered into by and between lenders and persons or corporations located in Kentucky and offering gainful employment to the inhabitants of the Commonwealth. The mortgage insurance corporation shall not be deemed to have been established for the purposes of this chapter unless and until its articles of incorporation shall have been approved by the authority, and if so approved, no approval by the Department of Insurance shall be required. Such articles of incorporation, in order to secure such approval, shall contain, inter alia, the following provisions:

The corporation shall be designated “Kentucky Mortgage Insurance and Guarantee Corporation;”

No member of the board of directors of the insurance corporation shall receive any emoluments for his services thereon, except that he may be reimbursed for expenditures incurred by him in the performance of duties for the insurance corporation;

All assistance fees received by the insurance corporation shall be held in a trust account in one or more banks and trust companies having a principal place of business in the Commonwealth;

The trust account shall be held for the security of the holders of mortgage loans or bonds guaranteed by the insurance corporation, except that provision may be made for the payment of expenses of the insurance corporation from the trust account or a segregated portion thereof;

The trust account shall be governed by a trust agreement entered into by and between the insurance corporation and the trustee or trustees. Said trust agreement shall contain such lawful provisions and limitations as may be deemed appropriate, and may include a pledge of premiums and other moneys deposited in the fund to the payment of the obligations insured by the insurance corporation; and

The trust agreement shall make appropriate provisions for the investment by the trustee or trustees of funds in the trust account for the benefit of the insurance corporation and of any claimants against the trust account. The moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the trust account shall be subject to the lien of such pledge without any further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties in accordance with the terms of the trust agreement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 15, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 198, effective July 15, 2010.

154.20-540.
Powers of insurance corporation.

The insurance corporation shall be empowered by its articles:

To contract with the authority to insure loans, bonds or their debt service, made by any lender or issuer to finance the acquisition, construction or alteration of any eligible project;

To enter into agreements for such insurance;

To fix a rate or rates of premiums to be paid for such insurance by the person or corporation assisted, which premiums shall be fixed to take into account the fact that the authority has paid an assistance fee to the insurance corporation as an assistance to the person or corporation whose loan or bond is being insured; and

To exercise such other powers as are necessary or incidental to the foregoing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 16, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 201, § 7, effective July 15, 1986.

154.20-550.
Insurance payable from trust account.

The insurance provided by the insurance corporation shall be payable solely from the trust account established by the insurance corporation under the terms of KRS 154.20-530, and shall not constitute a debt or pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, or of the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 17, effective July 1, 1978.

154.20-560.
Restrictions on insurance commitment.

The authority shall not recommend to the insurance corporation, and the insurance corporation shall not approve the insurance of any loan or bond under its contract with the authority, if the insurance of such loan or bond will result in a total commitment by the insurance corporation in excess of ten (10) times the amount in the trust account. No insurance commitment shall be made by the insurance corporation unless the authority has made the following findings:

That the loan or bond is to be secured by a first mortgage of real or personal property or both satisfactory to the authority;

That the mortgagor and mortgagee are responsible parties;

That the occupant of the project or projects is a responsible occupant;

That the provisions of the mortgage loan or bond are reasonable and proper, and in making such determination the authority may take into account such factors as it deems relevant including, without limitation, the provisions for maintaining, insuring and repairing the project by the mortgagee and the remedies of the authority or the insurance corporation upon default of the mortgagee;

That the project will provide employment having a reasonable relationship to the principal amount of the loan or bond issue to be insured therefor, taking into account, among other things, the investment per employee of comparable facilities;

That adequate provision is being or will be made to meet any increased demand upon community public facilities that might result from the project;

That the size and scope of the project is such that a definite benefit to the economy of the Commonwealth may reasonably be expected to result from the construction or improvement thereof; and the employment created shall be substantially primary employment;

That the principal amount of the loan or bond does not exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of the cost of the land, buildings, and improvements and eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the machinery and equipment;

That the duration of the loan or bond shall not exceed thirty (30) years on land, buildings and improvements exclusive of machinery and equipment, and fifteen (15) years on machinery and equipment; and that the authorization provisions are satisfactory to the authority;

That the insurance agreement provides for subrogation upon payment of insured debt service from the trust account;

That the public interest is adequately protected by the terms of the loan or bond and of the insurance agreement;

That the insurance of the loan or bond will not cause the insured debt service coming due in any one (1) calendar year on account of an insured loan or bond for any one (1) mortgagor to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the amount in the trust account when the finding is made; and

That the insurance of the loan or bond will not cause the insured debt service coming due in any one (1) calendar year on account of permanent guarantees to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the amount in the mortgage insurance trust when the finding is made.

The authority shall consult with the appropriate local and regional planning agencies to ascertain the relationship of a proposed project to any existing local or regional comprehensive plan; that, so far as feasible, the project is to be located in an area of generally high unemployment; and that employment opportunities will become available to the residents of such area.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 18, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 340, § 19, effective July 15, 1980.

154.20-570.
Contract recapture provisions.

Any contract between the authority and the insurance corporation shall contain provisions for the recapture by the authority of any profits made by the insurance corporation; but such recapture may be delayed indefinitely if the continued use of funds so derived by the insurance corporation shall be deemed by the authority to promote the purposes of the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 96, § 19, effective July 1, 1978.